District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Mu Lambda Foundation, Inc. Real Property Tax Exemption Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-1099.17. Mu Lambda Foundation, Inc. House; Lot 157, Square 3127.”.
(b) A new section 47-1099.17 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.17. Mu Lambda Foundation, Inc. House; Lot 157, Square 3127.
“(a) The real property and any improvements on the property, located at 2405 First Street,
NW, known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot 157, Square 3127 (“Property”), shall be
exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title, for the period beginning October 1, 2025,
and ending September 30, 2055, so long as the Property is owned by Mu Lambda Foundation,
Inc., is used for its charitable and educational purposes, and is not used for commercial purposes,
subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009 as if the exemption had been
granted administratively under this chapter.
“(b) The tax exemption provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to and not in
lieu of any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to Mu Lambda
Foundation, Inc.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2